Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1321
State employee, defined.

As used in sections 81-1320 to 81-1326, state employee shall mean any person or officer employed by the state including the head of any department or agency, except when such head is a board or commission, and who works a full-time or part-time schedule on an ongoing basis.

Laws 1973, LB 340, § 2;

Laws 1974, LB 1003, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 314, § 18.